Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254B.0509, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Base payment rates. new text begin (a) new text end Effective for services provided on or after January 1, 2026, the commissioner must implement the following base payment rates for substance use disorder treatment services under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1: (1) for low-intensity residential services, 100 percent of the modeled rate included in the final report required by Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 17, section 18; (2) for high-intensity residential services, 83 percent of the modeled rate included in the final report required by Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 17, section 18; and (3) for treatment coordination services, 100 percent of the modeled rate included in the final report required by Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 7, article 17, section 18. new text begin (b) Effective for services provided on or after January 1, 2027, the base payment rate for high-intensity residential services provided by adolescent treatment programs under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1, clause (9), shall be equal to 130 percent of the base payment rate for high-intensity services under paragraph (a) after any adjustments under subdivision 2. new text end